New York, session 2025-2026, A7762.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The New York state energy research and development authori- 2 ty is authorized and directed to study the feasibility, efficiency, and 3 energy saving costs if Brooklyn College were to construct a micro-grid 4 to power its campus. Such study shall include, but not be limited to: 5 (a) the cost of constructing a micro-grid to power such campus; 6 (b) the feasibility of constructing a micro-grid on campus; 7 (c) the efficiency of a micro-grid built on campus; 8 (d) the cost of operations to run a micro-grid three years after the 9 completion of construction; 10 (e) the potential effects of a micro-grid on Brooklyn College lessen- 11 ing the stress on current electrical systems; and 12 (f) the potential cost savings of Brooklyn College constructing a 13 micro-grid. 14 § 2. The New York state energy research and development authority 15 shall make a report to the governor and the legislature of its findings, 16 conclusions, and recommendations no later than thirteen months after the 17 effective date of this act and shall submit with this report such legis- 18 lative proposals as it deems necessary to implement its recommendations. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06635-01-5